Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.010

Authority for disincorporation—Petition—Resolution.

Any noncharter code city may be disincorporated. Proceedings may be initiated by the filing with the county auditor of a petition for disincorporation signed by a majority of the registered voters resident in such city, or the legislative body of the city may provide by resolution for an election on the proposition of disincorporation.

[ 1990 c 259 s 11; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.010.]

NOTES:

Sufficiency of petition in code city: RCW 35A.01.040.